famli/yua-famli.lexc
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Multichar_Symbols

%{V%}

%<v%>    ! Verbo

%<n%>    ! Sustantivo
%<adj%>  ! Adjetivo
%<pl%>   ! Plural
%<s_pl%>   ! Sujeto Plural

%<prx%>  ! Proximal 'this _'
%<med%>  ! Medial 'that _'
%<dst%>  ! Distal 'that _ over there'

%<incomp%> ! "ongoing incomplete"
%<past%> ! "Completed simple past"
%<perf%> ! "Completed Present Perfect"
%<subjun%> ! "Subjunctive"
%<pron%>  ! "pronoun"
%<1sg_poss%>  ! "pronoun"
%<2sg_poss%>  ! "pronoun"
%<3sg_poss%>  ! "pronoun"
%<1pl_poss%>  ! "pronoun"
%<2pl_poss%>  ! "pronoun"
%<3pl_poss%>  ! "pronoun"

%<poss_nonownership%>
%<poss_comm%>
%<poss_internal%>

%<poss%>  ! "posesivo"


%<hab%>

%<neg%>

%<ipfv%> ! imperfectivo "Ongoing incomplete"
%<pfv%>  ! perfectivo "Simple Past"
%<pf%>   ! perfect "Completed Present"
%<subj%>  ! subjunctive
%<s_sg%> ! sujeto singular
%<imp%>  ! imperativo
%<s_pl%> ! sujeto plural

%<s_sg1%>
%<s_sg2%>
%<s_sg3%>
%<s_pl1%>
%<s_pl2%>
%<s_pl3%>

%<o_sg1%>
%<o_sg2%>
%<o_sg3%>
%<o_pl1%>
%<o_pl2%>
%<o_pl3%>

%<female_agentive%>
%<male_agentive%>

%<tv%>            !
%<iv%>            ! 

%<attr%>          ! Attributive
%<der_l%>         ! Adjective derivation
%<term%>          ! Terminative morpheme
%<top%>          ! Topicalized
%<loc%>           ! locative

%{o%}             ! Either 'o' or nothing
%{e%}             ! Either 'e' or nothing
%{V%}             ! Copy stem vowel

ʼ                ! Glottal, U+02BC
%>                ! Morpheme boundary

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root
Nouns ;
Adjectives ;
IndependentPronouns ;
TransitiveVerbs ;
Miscellaneous ;
CvcTrans ;

LEXICON SetA

in:%<s_sg1%>%<pron%> # ;
kin:%<s_sg1%>%<pron%>%<hab%> # ;

a:%<s_sg2%>%<pron%> # ;
ka:%<s_sg2%>%<pron%>%<hab%> # ;
u:%<s_sg3%>%<pron%> # ;
ku:%<s_sg3%>%<pron%>%<hab%> # ;
k:%<s_pl1%>%<pron%> # ;
a:%<s_pl2%>%<pron%> # ;
u:%<s_pl3%>%<pron%> # ;

in:%<1sg_poss%>%<pron%> # ;
a:%<2sg_poss%>%<pron%> # ;
u:%<3sg_poss%>%<pron%> # ;
k:%<1pl_poss%>%<pron%> # ;
a:%<2pl_poss%>%<pron%> # ;
u:%<3pl_poss%>%<pron%> # ;

LEXICON IndependentPronouns
SetA ;

LEXICON Pronouns
SetA ;

LEXICON AgentivePrefixes
%<male_agentive%> ;
%<female_agentive%> ;

LEXICON IntransitiveSetB
%<s_sg1%>:en# ;
%<s_pl1%>:o'on # ;
%<s_sg2%>:ech # ;
%<s_pl2%>:e'ex # ;
%<s_sg1%>:en # ;
%<s_sg3%>:0 # ;
o'ob:%<s_pl3%> # ;


LEXICON TransitiveSetB
en:%<o_sg1%> PluralSubjSuffix ;
o'on:%<o_pl1%> PluralSubjSuffix ;
ech:%<o_sg2%> PluralSubjSuffix ;
e'ex:%<o_pl2%> PluralSubjSuffix ;
en:%<o_sg1%> PluralSubjSuffix ;
0:%<o_sg3%> PluralSubjSuffix ;
ih:%<o_sg3%> PluralSubjSuffix ;
o'ob:%<o_pl3%> PluralSubjSuffix ;


LEXICON PossessiveNominalSuffixes
il:%<poss_comm%> IntransitiveSetB ;
al:%<poss_nonownership%> IntransitiveSetB ;
el:%<poss_internal%> IntransitiveSetB ;
PluralSuffix ;
IntransitiveSetB ;

LEXICON PluralPossessorSuffix
o'ob:%<poss_pl%> Terminatives ;

LEXICON PluralSuffix
o'ob:%<pl%> Terminatives ;

LEXICON PluralSubjSuffix
o'ob:%<s_pl%> Terminatives ;
e'ex:%<s_pl%> Terminatives ;
Terminatives ;

LEXICON NounEndings
Terminatives ;
PluralSuffix ;
IntransitiveSetB ;
PossessiveNominalSuffixes ;

LEXICON AdjectiveEndings
Terminatives ;
IntransitiveSetB ;

LEXICON Terminatives
i':%<neg%> # ;
i':%<loc%> # ;
# ;

LEXICON Nouns
tsíimin:tsíimin%<n%> NounEndings ; ! "caballo"
káambal:káambal%<n%> NounEndings ; ! "estudiante"
ka'ansah:ka'ansah%<n%> NounEndings ; ! "maestro"
kòolnáal:kòolnáal%<n%> NounEndings ; ! "agricultor(a)"
wíinik:wíinik%<n%> NounEndings ; ! "humano"
máak:máak%<n%> NounEndings ; ! "persona"
míis:míis%<n%> NounEndings ; ! "gato"
pèek:pèek%<n%> NounEndings ; ! "perro"
hu'unalte%<n%> NounEndings ; ! "libro"
ùulum:ùulum%<n%> NounEndings ; ! "huajolote"
bàatsil:bàatsil%<n%> NounEndings ; ! "amigo"

LEXICON Adjectives
wi'ih:wi'ih AdjectiveEndings ; ! "hambriento"
uk'ah:uk'ah AdjectiveEndings ; ! "con sed"
ka'ana'an:ka'ana'an AdjectiveEndings ; ! "cansado"
chak:chak AdjectiveEndings ; ! "rojo"
k'an:k'an AdjectiveEndings ; ! "amarillo"

LEXICON CvcTrans

! Should they lemmatize to the cvc transitive root in all voices?
bon%<v%>%<tv%>:bon TransVozActiva ;
bòon%<v%>%<iv%>:bòon TransVozAntipasiva ;
bo'on%<v%>%<iv%>:bo'on TransVozPasiva ;
bóon%<v%>%<iv%>:bóon TransVozMedia ;


LEXICON TransVozActiva
%<ipfv%>:ik TransitiveSetB;
%<pfv%>:ah TransitiveSetB;
%<pf%>:mah TransitiveSetB;
%<subj%>%<s_sg%>:0 TransitiveSetB;
%<subj%>%<s_pl%>:eh TransitiveSetB;
%<imp%>%<s_sg%>:0 TransitiveSetB;
%<imp%>%<s_pl%>:eh TransitiveSetB;

LEXICON TransVozAntipasiva
%<ipfv%>:0 Obj;

! TODO: for all of the following entries, the geminate "n%>n -> n"
%<pfv%>:nah PluralSubjSuffix;
%<pf%>:naha'an PluralSubjSuffix;
%<subj%>%<s_sg%>:nak PluralSubjSuffix;
%<subj%>%<s_pl%>:eh PluralSubjSuffix;
%<imp%>%<s_sg%>:nen PluralSubjSuffix;
%<imp%>%<s_pl%>:nene'ex PluralSubjSuffix;

LEXICON TransVozPasiva
! TODO: vowel harmony (in twol?)
%<ipfv%>:%{V%}l PluralSubjSuffix;
%<pfv%>:a'ab PluralSubjSuffix;
%<pf%>:a'an PluralSubjSuffix;
%<subj%>:%{V%}k PluralSubjSuffix;
%<imp%>:%{V%}k PluralSubjSuffix;

LEXICON TransVozMedia
%<ipfv%>:%{V%}l PluralSubjSuffix;
%<pfv%>:0 PluralSubjSuffix;
%<pf%>:a'an PluralSubjSuffix;
%<subj%>:%{V%}k PluralSubjSuffix;
%<imp%>:0 PluralSubjSuffix;

LEXICON TransitiveVerbs
k'ahóol:k'ahóol%<tv%> TransitiveSetB ;

LEXICON Miscellaneous
ma'a:ma'a%<neg%> #;
